Utah statutes.
35A-6-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter and in Title 34, Labor in General:
(1)  "Apprentice" means an individual at least 16 years of age who has entered
into:
(a)  a written agreement approved by the Bureau of Apprenticeship and Training
with an employer or the employer's agent, an association of employers, an
organization of employees, or a joint committee representing employers and
employees; or
(b)  an apprenticeship that meets Bureau of Apprenticeship and Training
Standards.
(2)  "Bureau of Apprenticeship and Training" means the federal agency
designated by the United States Department of Labor to oversee apprenticeship
programs.
